test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kaarbis_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - käärbis: # contracted
    käärbis+N+Sg+Nom: käärbis
    käärbis+N+Sg+Gen: kárbá
    käärbis+N+Sg+Acc: kárbá
    käärbis+N+Sg+Ill: kárbás
    käärbis+N+Sg+Loc: kárbást
    käärbis+N+Sg+Com: kárbáin
    käärbis+N+Sg+Abe: kárbáttáá
    käärbis+N+Ess: kärbisin
    käärbis+N+Par: kärbisid
    käärbis+N+Pl+Nom: kárbáh
    käärbis+N+Pl+Gen: kárbái
    käärbis+N+Pl+Acc: kárbáid
    käärbis+N+Pl+Ill: kárbáid
    käärbis+N+Pl+Loc: kárbáin
    käärbis+N+Pl+Com: kárbáiguin
    käärbis+N+Pl+Abe: kárbáittáá
